Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3904
Communication between courts.

(1) A court
of this state may communicate with a court in another state concerning a proceeding
arising under the Nebraska Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings
Jurisdiction Act. The court may allow the parties to participate in the communication.
Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, the court
shall make a record of the communication. The record may be limited to the
fact that the communication occurred.

(2) Courts
may communicate concerning schedules, calendars, court records, and other
administrative matters without making a record.

Laws 2011, LB157, § 8.